Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 4. Ways of Necessity for Certain Purposes

§§ 1-26-401 through 1-26-405.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to eminent domain, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

.

Editor's notes. —

This article derived from Laws 1907, ch. 52, §§ 1, 9 and 12, Laws 1977, ch. 73, § 1 and Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.